Privacy Policy
Last updated: July 4th, 2022
This Privacy Statement (the "Privacy Statement") is provided by:
Whereby AS ("Whereby"/"we")
Gate 1 no. 107, 6700 Måløy, Norway
Business organization number NO 997742346
Introduction
This policy describes what information we collect when you use Whereby’s sites, services, mobile applications, products, and content (“Services”). It also provides information about how we store, transfer, use, and delete that information, and what choices you have with respect to the information.
This policy applies to Whereby’s online video meeting tool, including the website and mobile applications, and other Whereby websites (collectively “the Websites”), as well as other interaction (e.g. customer support conversations, user surveys and interviews etc.) you may have with Whereby.
This policy applies where we are acting as a Data Controller with respect to the personal data of users of our Services; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data. For content and data that you upload to or make available through the Service (“User Content”), you are responsible for ensuring this content is in accordance with our Terms of Service, and that the content is not violating other users’ privacy.
How we collect, process and store information
We in Whereby are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our users. Our business model is to provide a paid service to users who need additional features on top of the Free version, and does not rely on widespread collection of general user data. We will only collect and process information that we need to deliver the service to you, and to continue to maintain and develop the service. If you are on a plan for professional use, we also collect public information about your company for our commercial purposes.
Whereby may collect, store and process various kinds of data, with different legal grounds, as listed below. For the categories of data that require your consent, we will actively ask you for consent before collecting any data. You can give and revoke your consents at any time in your
Settings page
.
The following is a list of data we collect, process or store, with the purpose and legal ground listed for each item or group of items having the same purpose and legal ground:
User account information.
Users that choose to register in Whereby, will have to provide a valid email address or phone number. The user can also choose to enter a display name and/or add a profile picture that will be used to represent them in conversations. If you as a user choose to sign up with an external authentication service, e.g. Google Sign-In, we will fetch and store email address, name and profile image URL from this service.
Room information.
To create a room in Whereby, you as a user will have to select a room name. This name will be publicly visible, and will be used by other users accessing meetings in that room. You as user are responsible for the content you enter into a room name, and the content has to be compliant with our guidelines for Prohibited Content in Terms of Services.
The information may be used for the purposes of operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and communicating with you. This is required to deliver the Service to you as user, by taking steps, at your request, to enter into and to fulfilling such a contract (Terms of Service) cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b.
Transaction information.
Customers that choose to purchase a paid version of the Services provide Whereby (and our payment processors, including debt collectors) with billing details such as credit card information, billing email, banking information, location at the time of transaction and/or a billing address.
The transaction data may be processed for the purpose of supplying the purchased services and keeping proper records of those transactions. This data may be used for the purpose of delivering the Services to you. Processing this information is required for fulfilling the contract we entered into with you, at your request (our Terms of Service) cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b. Additionally, this information needs to be retained in order to comply with accounting and tax regulation cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item c.
Usage information.
When you as a user interact with the Services, we collect and process metadata to provide additional context about the way the Service is being used. The usage data may include your IP address, geographical location, browser type and version, operating system, referral source, length of visit, page views and website navigation paths, as well as information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your service use. The source of the usage data is our server software and our analytics tracking system. We may make specific offers or provide information to you based on your product usage, such as your use of certain product features or the use of the product across your company's email domain.
Product Analytics data.
Whereby logs activities by you and other users when the users interact with our websites or apps, when a page or a room is visited or where there is a conversation. We will never collect or record the content in conversations.
Please note that access to the conversation metadata, such as the participants’ ID (random alphanumeric number generated by the system), display names (optional), device information, duration of the call and any issues faced during the conversation, without being able to access the video or audio content of the conversation, may be accessible to our embedded customer’s support team or adiministrators via admin dashboard
Technical log data.
Like most digital services, our servers automatically collect information when Websites or Services are accessed or used and record it in log files. This log data may include the Internet Protocol (IP) address, the address of the web page visited within the Services, browser type and settings, the date and time the Services were used, information about browser configuration and plugins, language preferences and cookie data.
Device information.
Whereby may collect and process information about devices used to access the Services, including type of device, what operating system is used, device settings, application IDs, unique device identifiers and crash data. Whether we collect and process some or all of this information depends on the type of device used and its settings.
Location information.
We receive information from you and other third-parties that helps us approximate your location. We may, for example, use a business address submitted by your employer, or an IP address received from your browser or device to determine approximate location. Whereby may also collect location information from devices in accordance with the consent process provided by your device.
The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f, namely using this data for the purpose of ensuring the proper administration of our website and business, analyzing the use of the website and services, monitoring and improving our website and services, improving the user experience, detecting and correcting faults/errors, preventing abuse, and assisting users with support inquiries. When necessary to assist you with your support inquiries, we may also process the data on the basis that it is necessary to performing the contract we entered into with you, at your request (our Terms of Service), cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b. When we process the data for security purposes, we do so on the basis of our legal obligations, cf. GDPR art. 6(1) item c, including our obligation to keep personal information secure. For information about cookies and how to opt out of cookies, see our
Cookie Policy
.
Customer Support Information.
We may process information that you send to us, should you choose to submit a ticket to our support email. If you contact us, we may use your Account, Room, Transaction or Usage Information to respond.
Processing this information is required for performing the contract we entered into with you, at your request (our Terms of Service), as well as our legitimate interest of handling your requests cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f. Processing the information you submit and our responses to you are also necessary to help our customer support staff give each other feedback and learn, which constitutes our legitimate interest cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f.
Product & Marketing communication.
We may process information that you provide to us in the context of signing up to our service, trial or a specific type of communication. We may ask our customers to complete reviews or to speak about their experiences using our products. If we may process more information than this, we will be transparent upfront. You can control what information we send to you by changing your
Privacy settings
. You also find a link to unsubscribe from our product and marketing e-mails at the bottom of each e-mail.
The legal basis for this processing is as a starting point our legitimate interest, cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f, in helping you put your new plan to use, sharing informational or exciting content, informing about product features, or giving you a good offer. If the processing requires your consent, cf. GDPR art 6 (1) item a, we will obtain it before we process your personal information.
Public professional information.
If you are on a plan for professional use, we may also collect public information about your company. This may include information you make available through a public LinkedIn profile. We use this information to assess if we should contact your company. If you are an appropriate point of contact for your company we may seek additional public contact information through LinkedIn and Zoominfo. Both Zoominfo and LinkedIn allows you to know what data they have collected about you; you can find it
here
for Zoominfo and
here
for LinkedIn. Similar information may also be used for learning more about our job applicants where this is necessary to make decisions about their candidacy.
The legal basis for processing professional information for the purposes of initiating, maintaining or building a a contractual relationship is our legitimate interest, cf. GDPR art.6 (1) item f.
Service and transactional notifications.
Sometimes we’ll send you emails about your account, service changes or new policies. You can’t opt out of this type of “service or transactional” emails (unless you delete your account) as they are necessary information for the Services.
The legal grounds for processing this information is that it is required for performing our commitment about communicating changes in plans and pricing to you in the contract we entered into with you, at your request (our Terms of Service) cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b, and our legitimate interest of communicating important information about your account to you, cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f.
Correspondence information.
We may process information that you choose to share with us if you participate in a focus group, contest, activity or event, apply for a job, interact with our social media accounts or otherwise communicate with Whereby.
The correspondence data may be processed for the purposes of communicating with you and record-keeping. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f, namely the proper administration of our website and business and communications with users.
Integrations with external services
You as a participant in a meeting may choose to open one of the integrations we provide (Google Drive, YouTube, Trello and others) in rooms where these have been enabled. We may store data from use of integrations in a local browser storage, and process this to enrich the user experience. This data can be deleted with the delete option in the integration settings or by deleting it from the cache of your browser. When using an integration, metadata like title, thumbnail, dates and share permissions about content selected may be fetched and displayed in the web page. We may store non-personal/non-restricted information (eg. content id and access date) in a local browser storage to display lists of recently opened integrations. Restricted metadata is always stored by the services themselves and requires explicit consent given by the facing user to fetch it. The implementation is in compliance with the services privacy policies:
Google Privacy Policy
,
Trello Privacy Policy
and
Miro Privacy Policy
.
The information may be used for the purposes of operating our website and providing our services. This is required to deliver the Service to you as user, by taking steps, at your request, to enter into and to fulfilling such a contract (Terms of Service) cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b.
Research information
We gather the data from and about the research subjects involved in the research we are conducting in relation to our product.
The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f, namely the testing and improvement of our services.
Investor information
We may process the data about our investors and potential investors visiting our data rooms.
The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item f, namely the management of our company and its finances.
Please note that, for some of our customers, we are the processor of the following and other data categories: Display Name, Email address, Admin user (yes / no), Organization affiliation (for personal user accounts associated with a Business account), Video rooms created, Room name, Profile picture, Background picture.
How we process media (audio/video)
Participants exchange media such as audio, video and screen sharing within meetings. We only process media to enable participants to use our Service; we do not process media for our own purposes.
The legal ground for processing media is to fulfill the contract (Terms of Service) cf. GDPR art. 6 (1) item b.
We will not store any meeting recordings or media sent between participants in a room, except on a strictly transient basis where this is a necessary part of the transmission. Customers who have access to the “Recording” feature will be able to record meetings, and they are then responsible for collecting consents from all participants in the meeting prior to starting the recording. They are also responsible for storing and processing the recording in compliance with regulations after downloading it from Whereby.
Security
Rooms will by default be set to Group call mode. Group call mode is delivered over a dedicated server infrastructure to allow many people in conversation while ensuring good stability. Your stream will be sent through video router servers which transmits it to the other participants in the call, and also transmits their streams to you. Streams will always be encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) in transit, but will be decrypted and re-encrypted when passing through the video routers. We operate an infrastructure of video routers distributed across the world, and you will be automatically routed to the closest one. The video router servers and all of our infrastructure adhere to strict security measures, preventing any eavesdropping or interruption of the video/audio streams.
Users can also choose to use “Small meeting” mode in Room Settings if they wish to prioritise having end-to-end encryption over quality and stability. In “Small meeting” mode, communication between participants is primarily sent through peer-to-peer connections, where audio and video streams are sent directly between participants and do not pass through any of our servers. Video and audio transmitted in the Service is then sent directly between the participants in a room and is encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) with client-generated encryption keys. In cases where a user is behind a strict firewall or NAT, video and audio need to be relayed via a TURN server, but end-to-end encryption is still maintained.
Providing your personal data to others
We may share information with third parties in some circumstances, including: (1) with your consent; (2) to a service provider or partner who meets our data protection standards; (3) with academic or non-profit researchers, with aggregation, anonymization; (4) when we have a good faith belief it is required by law, such as pursuant to a subpoena or other legal process; (5) to protect the vital interest of others, when we have reason to believe that doing so will prevent harm to someone or illegal activities.
Our categories of service providers and partners are:
Hosting/infrastructure/storage providers
Payment processors, including debt collectors
Analysis tools providers
Customer Support tools providers
Marketing and email providers
Co-marketing content providers
Recruiting tools providers
Internal communication tools providers
Law enforcement and judiciary based on a lawful order based on the jurisdiction we are subject to, or to combat unlawful use of our platform.
We only share data with co-marketing content partners when you, at your own initiative, fill a form to obtain the content. We will make sure it is clear to you that we have developed the content with our partner and that the partner will also obtain relevant information.
Business Transfers
We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes, and on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
In the case where we are involved in a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, reorganization or sale of assets such that your information would be transferred or become subject to a different privacy policy, we will notify you in advance and give you the option to delete your data before the transfer.
International transfers of your personal data
In some circumstances your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the European Economic Area (EEA). You acknowledge that personal data that you submit for publication through our website or services may be available, via the internet, around the world. We cannot prevent the use (or misuse) of such personal data by others. For information about what types of content you as a user are responsible, see this
Terms of Service
.
We and our other group companies have offices and facilities in Norway, the United Kingdom and the United States. The hosting facilities for Account information stored by Whereby are situated in Ireland. The hosting facilities for Usage information are situated in Ireland and the United States. Transfers to the United States will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely the use of
Standard Contractual Clause (SCC)
adopted or approved by the European Commission.
Please note that, for new data transfers, we will continue to rely on the old SCCs until September 27,2021. For existing transfer, we will continue to rely on SCCs until December 27, 2022, by which time all data transfers relying on the old SCCs will be moved over to the
new SCCs adopted and approved by the European Commission.
Retaining and deleting personal data
Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
We will retain your personal data as follows:
Transaction information will be retained for a minimum period of 5 years following date of the transaction, and for a maximum period of 10 years following the date of the transaction.
In some cases it is not possible for us to specify in advance the periods for which your personal data will be retained. In such cases, we will determine the period of retention based on the following criteria:
Account information, Room information will be retained until you decide to delete your account or delete a room in Whereby.
Information about you used for Product & Marketing communication will be retained until you opt-out or withdraw your opt-in. You can change permissions through
Privacy Settings
.
The period of retention of usage information will be determined based on the need for historical data to determine statistical validity and relevance for product decisions and technical monitoring.
Regardless of the provisions above, we may retain your personal data where such retention is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
Children
Whereby is only for people 16 years old and over. By using Whereby, you affirm that you are over 16. If we learn that someone under 16 is using Whereby, we’ll terminate their account. For use in educational settings or use of our Embedded product in your own service,
contact us
. We encourage parents with concerns to contact us at
legal@whereby.com
.
Changes to this policy
We can change these Terms at any time. We keep a historical record of all changes to our Terms on
GitHub
. If a change is material, we’ll let you know before it takes effect. By using Whereby on or after that effective date, you agree to the new Terms. If you don’t agree to them, you should delete your account before they take effect, otherwise your use of the Service and Content will be subject to the new Terms.
Managing and deleting your personal information
If you have a Whereby account, you can access, modify or export your personal information, or delete your account in
Settings
. If you delete your account, your information and content will be unrecoverable after that time. You may instruct us at any time not to process your personal information for marketing purposes, by adjusting your
Privacy settings
). We may withhold personal information that you request to the extent permitted by law.
Your rights
As an individual you are granted rights according to the applicable data protection law:
The right to access to your personal data
The right to rectification of your personal data
The right to object to and restriction of our processing of your personal data
The also right to be forgotten; erasure of your data.
The right to data portability.
If you have provided your consent to your processing of personal data, you may also withdraw your consent at any time, on our Settings > Consent page.
The rights are not absolute, and you may read more about your rights in the EU general data protection regulation Chapter III, or at
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/rights-citizens_en
To exercise your rights or if you otherwise have any questions regarding our processing of your personal data, we encourage you to contact us as described below. However, we also notify you that you may raise a complaint to a data protection authority. As a Norwegian company, Whereby uses the Norwegian Data Protection Authority (Datatilsynet) as a supervising authority. You may find further information on their website:
https://www.datatilsynet.no/
. You may contact your national/state supervisory authority, but Whereby will retain the Norwegian Data Protection Authority as our lead supervisory authority.
Data protection officer
Our data protection officer's contact details are:
dpo@whereby.com
To learn more, visit the
Privacy section in our FAQ
.
For any questions about this privacy policy, please contact
legal@whereby.com
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://whereby.com/user/privacy:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
This website uses cookies
We use cookies 🍪 to improve your experience on our site. To find out more read our
Cookie Policy
. To customise your experience, go to
Cookie Settings
.
Cookie settings
Accept all cookies
Accept all cookies
Cookie settings
Log in
Log in with Google
Sign in with Apple
or
Work email
Enter the email you signed up with to receive your login code
Log in
New to Whereby?
Sign up for free
Sub-policy 1
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 2
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Close
View this page in
your language
?
All languages
中文
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
한국어
Nederlands
日本語
Português
Pусский
Polski
Legal
Legal information
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
What this policy covers
What information we collect about you
How we use information we collect
How we disclose information we collect
How we store and secure information we collect
How long we keep information
How to access and control your information
How we transfer information we collect internationally
Other important privacy information
Additional disclosures for CA residents
Contact us
Key Changes
Privacy Policy
Effective starting: May 17, 2024
(
view archived versions
)
What this policy covers
Your privacy is important to us, and so is being transparent about how we collect, use, and share information about you. This policy is intended to help you understand:
What information we collect about you
How we use information we collect
How we disclose information we collect
How we store and secure information we collect
How long we keep information
How to access and control your information
How we transfer information we collect internationally
Other important privacy information
Additional disclosures for California residents
This Privacy Policy covers the information we collect about you when you use our products or services, or otherwise interact with us (for example, by attending our premises or events or by communicating with us), unless a different policy is displayed. For information about how we process applicant and former employee data, please see the
Atlassian Careers Privacy Notice
or the
Former Workplace Privacy Notice
. For information about how we process information submitted in a voluntary demographic survey during the application process, see our
Demographic Survey Privacy Notice
. Atlassian, we and us refers to Atlassian Pty Ltd, Atlassian US, Inc. and any of our corporate affiliates. We offer a wide range of products,
including our cloud, server and data center products
.  We refer to all of these products, together with our other services and websites as "Services" in this policy.
This policy also explains your choices surrounding how we use information about you, which include how you can object to certain uses of information about you and how you can access and update certain information about you.
If you do not agree with this policy, do not access or use our Services or interact with any other aspect of our business
.
Where we provide the Services under contract with an organization (for example, your employer), that organization controls the information processed by the Services. For more information, please see Notice to End Users below. This policy does not apply to the extent we process personal information in the role of a processor on behalf of such organizations.
What information we collect about you
We collect information about you when you provide it to us, when you use our Services, and when other sources provide it to us, as further described below.
Information you provide to us
We collect information about you when you input it into the Services or otherwise provide it directly to us.
Account and Profile Information:
We collect information about you when you register for an account, create or modify your profile, set preferences, sign-up for or make purchases through the Services. For example, you provide your contact information and, in some cases, billing information, when you register for the Services. You also have the option of adding a display name, profile photo, job title, and other details to your profile information to be displayed in our Services.  We keep track of your preferences when you select settings within the Services.
Content you provide through our products
: The Services include the Atlassian products you use, where we collect and store content that you post, send, receive and share. This content includes any information about you that you may choose to include. Examples of content we collect and store include: the summary and description added to a Jira issue, the pages you create in Confluence, the name of a Trello board, your repositories and pull requests in Bitbucket, information regarding an incident in Statuspage or Opsgenie, any stories you name in Jira Align, any forms you create in Jira, and any feedback you provide to us. Content also includes the files and links you upload to the Services. If you use a server or data center version of the Services, we do not host, store, transmit, receive or collect information about you (including your content), except in limited cases, where permitted by your administrator: we collect feedback you provide directly to us through the product and; we collect content using analytics techniques that hash, filter or otherwise scrub the information to exclude information that might identify you or your organization; and we collect clickstream data about how you interact with and use features in the Services. Server and data center administrators can disable our collection of this information from the Services via the administrator settings or prevent this information from being disclosed to us by blocking transmission at the local network level.
Content you provide through our websites:
The Services also include our websites owned or operated by us. We collect other content that you submit to these websites, which include social media or social networking websites operated by us. For example, you provide content to us when you provide feedback or when you participate in any interactive features, surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, activities or events.
Information you provide through our support channels:
The Services also include our customer support, where you may choose to submit information regarding a problem you are experiencing with a Service.  Whether you designate yourself as a technical contact, open a support ticket, speak to one of our representatives directly or otherwise engage with our support team, you will be asked to provide contact information, a summary of the problem you are experiencing, and any other documentation, screenshots or information that would be helpful in resolving the issue.
Payment Information:
We collect payment and billing information when you register for certain paid Services.  For example, we ask you to designate a billing representative, including name and contact information, upon registration.  You might also provide payment information, such as payment card details, which we collect via secure payment processing services.
Information we collect automatically when you use the Services
We collect information about you when you use our Services, including browsing our websites and taking certain actions within the Services.
Your use of the Services
: We keep track of certain information about you when you visit and interact with any of our Services. This information includes the features you use; the links you click on; the type, size and filenames of attachments you upload to the Services; search terms; your team’s Jira Align story progress; and how you interact with others on the Services.  We also collect information about the teams and people you work with and how you work with them, like who you collaborate with and communicate with most frequently.  If you use a server or data center version of the Services, the information we collect about your use of the Services is limited to clickstream data about how you interact with and use features in the Services, in addition to content-related information described in "Content you provide through our products," above.  Server and data center administrators can disable our collection of this information from the Services via the administrator settings or prevent this information from being disclosed to us by blocking transmission at the local network level.
Device and Connection Information
: We collect information about your computer, phone, tablet, or other devices you use to access the Services. This device information includes your connection type and settings when you install, access, update, or use our Services. We also collect information through your device about your operating system, browser type, IP address, URLs of referring/exit pages, device identifiers, and crash data. We use your IP address and/or country preference in order to approximate your location to provide you with a better Service experience.  How much of this information we collect depends on the type and settings of the device you use to access the Services.  Server and data center Service administrators can disable collection of this information via the administrator settings or prevent this information from being disclosed to us by blocking transmission at the local network level.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
: Atlassian and our third-party partners, such as our advertising and analytics partners, use cookies and other tracking technologies (e.g., web beacons, device identifiers and pixels) to provide functionality and to recognize you across different Services and devices. For more information, please see our
Cookies and Tracking Notice
, which includes information on how to control or opt out of these cookies and tracking technologies. Please refer to
Loom's Cookie Policy
for details on cookies and tracking technologies used within Loom products and websites.
Information we receive from other sources
We receive information about you from other Service users, from third-party services, from our related companies, social media platforms, public databases, and from our business and channel partners. We may combine this information with information we collect through other means described above. This helps us to update and improve our records, identify new customers, create more personalized advertising and suggest services that may be of interest to you.
Other users of the Services
: Other users of our Services may provide information about you when they submit content through the Services. For example, you may be mentioned in a Jira issue or paged via an Opsgenie incident opened by someone else, a team member may upload content about you to a Trello board, or your team’s story status may be discussed in Jira Align.  We also receive your email address from other Service users when they provide it in order to invite you to the Services.  Similarly, an administrator may provide your contact information when they designate you as the billing or technical contact on your company's account or when they designate you as an administrator.
Other services you link to your account
: We receive information about you when you or your administrator integrate third-party apps, like Power-UPs, or link a third-party service with our Services. For example, if you create an account or log into the Services using your Google credentials, we receive your name and email address as permitted by your Google profile settings in order to authenticate you. You or your administrator may also integrate our Services with other services you use, such as to allow you to access, store, disclose and edit certain content from a third-party through our Services.  For example, you may authorize our Services to access, display and store files from a third-party document-sharing service within the Services interface. Or you may authorize our Services to connect with a third-party calendaring service or to sync a contact list or address book so that your meetings and connections are available to you through the Services, so you can invite others to collaborate with you on our Services or so your organization can limit access to certain users. Your administrator may also authorize our Services to connect with a third party reporting service so your organization can review how the Services are being used. The information we receive when you link or integrate our Services with a third-party service depends on the settings, permissions and privacy policy controlled by that third-party service. You should always check the privacy settings and notices in these third-party services to understand what data may be disclosed to us or shared with our Services.
Atlassian Companies
:  We receive information about you from other Atlassian corporate affiliates, in accordance with their terms and policies.
Atlassian Partners
:  We work with a
global network of partners
who provide consulting, implementation, training and other services around our products.  Some of these partners also help us to market and promote our Services, generate leads for us, and resell our Services.  We receive information from these partners, such as billing information, billing and technical contact information, company name, what Atlassian Services you have purchased or may be interested in, evaluation information you have provided, what events you have attended, and what country you are in.
Other Partners
: We receive information about you and your activities on and off the Services from third-party partners, such as advertising and market research partners who provide us with information about your interest in and engagement with, our Services and online advertisements.
Third Party Providers
: We may receive information about you from third party providers of business information and publicly available sources (like social media platforms), including physical mail addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), IP addresses and social media profiles, for the purposes of targeted advertising of products that may interest you, delivering personalized communications, event promotion, and profiling.
How we use information we collect
How we use the information we collect depends in part on which Services you use, how you use them, and any preferences you have communicated to us.  Below are the specific purposes for which we use the information we collect about you.
To provide the Services and personalize your experience
: We use information about you to provide the Services to you, including to process transactions with you, authenticate you when you log in, provide customer support, and operate, maintain, and improve the Services.  For example, we use the name and picture you provide in your account to identify you to other Service users. Our Services also include tailored features that personalize your experience, enhance your productivity, and improve your ability to collaborate effectively with others by automatically analyzing the activities of your team to provide search results, activity feeds, notifications, connections and recommendations that are most relevant for you and your team.  For example, we may use your stated job title and activity to return search results we think are relevant to your job function.  We also use information about you to connect you with other team members seeking your subject matter expertise. We may use your email domain to infer your affiliation with a particular organization or industry to personalize the content and experience you receive on our websites. Where you use multiple Services, we combine information about you and your activities to provide an integrated experience, such as to allow you to find information from one Service while searching from another or to present relevant product information as you travel across our websites. Based on your interactions with different Atlassian products and advertisements, we will personalize your experience and tailor our communications and offers to you. To opt out of this personalization, please contact privacy@atlassian.com.
For research and development
:  We are always looking for ways to make our Services smarter, faster, secure, integrated, and useful.  We use information and collective learnings (including feedback) about how people use our Services to troubleshoot, to identify trends, usage, activity patterns, and areas for integration and to improve our Services and to develop new products, features and technologies that benefit our users and the public. For example, to improve the @mention feature, we automatically analyze recent interactions among users and how often they @mention one another to surface the most relevant connections for users. We automatically analyze and aggregate search terms to improve the accuracy and relevance of suggested topics that auto-populate when you use the search feature. In some cases, we apply these learnings across our Services to improve and develop similar features, to better integrate the Services you use, or to provide you with insights based on how others use our Services. We also test and analyze certain new features with some users before rolling the feature out to all users.
To communicate with you about the Services
: We use your contact information to send transactional communications via email and within the Services, including confirming your purchases, reminding you of subscription expirations, responding to your comments, questions and requests, providing customer support, and sending you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and administrative messages.  We send you email notifications when you or others interact with you on the Services, for example, when you are @mentioned on a page or ticket, when a task is assigned to you, or when you are added to a Trello board. Depending on your chosen method of contact, we may send you SMS notifications or call you if you are on-call for incident alerts in Opsgenie.
We also provide tailored communications based on your activity and interactions with us.  For example, certain actions you take in the Services may automatically trigger a feature or third-party app suggestion within the Services that would make that task easier.  We also send you communications as you onboard to a particular Service to help you become more proficient in using that Service. These communications are part of the Services and in most cases you cannot opt out of them.  If an opt out is available, you will find that option within the communication itself or in your account settings.
To market, promote and drive engagement with the Services:
We use your contact information and information about how you use the Services to send promotional communications that may be of specific interest to you, including by email and by displaying Atlassian ads on other companies' websites and applications.  These communications may be informed by audits of interactions (like counting ad impressions), and are aimed at driving engagement and maximizing what you get out of the Services, including information about new features, survey requests, newsletters, and events we think may be of interest to you.  We also communicate with you about new Services, product offers, promotions, and contests.  You can control whether you receive these communications as described below under "Opt-out of communications."
Customer support
: We use your information to resolve technical issues you encounter, to respond to your requests for assistance, to analyze crash information, and to repair and improve the Services. Where you give us express permission to do so, we disclose information to a third party expert for the purpose of responding to support-related requests.
For safety and security
: We use information about you and your Service use to verify accounts and activity, to detect, prevent, and respond to potential or actual security incidents and to monitor and protect against other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, including violations of Service policies.
To protect our legitimate business interests and legal rights
:
Where required by law or where we believe it is necessary to protect our legal rights, interests and the interests of others, we use information about you in connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory, and audit functions, and disclosures in connection with the acquisition, merger or sale of a business.
With your consent
: We use information about you where you have given us consent to do so for a specific purpose not listed above.  For example, we may publish testimonials or featured customer stories to promote the Services, with your permission.
Legal bases for processing (for EEA users)
:
If you are an individual in the European Economic Area (EEA), we collect and process information about you only where we have legal bases for doing so under applicable EU laws.  The legal bases depend on the Services you use and how you use them. This means we collect and use your information only where:
We need it to provide you the Services, including to operate the Services, provide customer support and personalized features and to protect the safety and security of the Services;
It satisfies a legitimate interest (which is not overridden by your data protection interests), such as for research and development, to market and promote the Services and to protect our legal rights and interests;
You give us consent to do so for a specific purpose; or
We need to process your data to comply with a legal obligation.
If you have consented to our use of information about you for a specific purpose, you have the right to change your mind at any time, but this will not affect any processing that has already taken place.  Where we are using your information because we or a third party (e.g. your employer) have a legitimate interest to do so, you have the right to object to that use though, in some cases, this may mean no longer using the Services.
How we disclose information we collect
We make collaboration tools, and we want them to work well for you.  This means disclosing information through the Services and to certain third parties.  We disclose information we collect about you in the ways discussed below, including in connection with possible business transfers. Please note that information about you, your devices, and your behavior collected through third-party cookies, pixels, tags, or other tracking technologies for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising may be considered a “sale” or “share” under certain US state laws. However, Atlassian is not a data broker, and we do not sell personal information for monetary consideration.
Disclosing to other Service users
When you use the Services, we disclose certain information about you to other Service users.
For collaboration
: You can create content, which may contain information about you, and grant permission to others to see, disclose, edit, copy and download that content based on settings you or your administrator (if applicable) select.  Some of the collaboration features of the Services display some or all of your profile information to other Service users when you disclose or interact with specific content.  For example, when you comment on a Confluence page or Jira issue, we display your profile picture and name next to your comments so that other users with access to the page or issue understand who made the comment. Similarly, when you publish a Confluence page, your name is displayed as the author of that page, and Service users with permission to view the page can view your profile information as well.  Your team’s story status in Jira Align or certain profile information when you are listed in an Opsgenie on-call schedule, can be seen by other users with certain role permissions or team assignments. Please be aware that some aspects of the Services like Confluence pages, Bitbucket repositories, or Trello boards can be made publicly available, meaning any content posted in that space, including information about you, can be publicly viewed, indexed by, and returned in search results of search engines.  You can confirm whether certain Service properties are publicly visible from within the Services or by contacting the relevant administrator.
Managed accounts and administrators
: If you register or access the Services using an email address with a domain that is owned by your employer or organization or associate that email address with your existing account, and such organization wishes to establish an account or site, certain information about you including your name, profile picture, contact info, content and past use of your account may become accessible to that organization’s administrator and other Service users sharing the same domain.  If you are an administrator for a particular site or group of users within the Services, we may disclose your contact information to current or past Service users, for the purpose of facilitating Service-related requests.
Community Forums
:  Our websites offer publicly accessible blogs, forums, issue trackers, and wikis (e.g.,
Atlassian Community
,
Atlassian Developer Community
,
Trello Community
, and
Trello Inspiration
). You should be aware that any information you provide on these websites - including profile information associated with the account you use to post the information - may be read, collected, and used by any member of the public who accesses these websites.  Your posts and certain profile information may remain even after you terminate your account. We urge you to consider the sensitivity of any information you input into these Services. To request removal of your information from publicly accessible websites operated by us, please contact us as provided below. In some cases, we may not be able to remove your information, in which case we will let you know if we are unable to and why.
Disclosing to third parties
We disclose information to third parties that help us operate, provide, improve, integrate, customize, support and market our Services. All the above categories exclude text messaging originator opt-in data and consent; this information will not be shared with any third parties, excluding aggregators and providers of the text messaging services.
Service Providers
: We work with third-party service providers to provide website and application development, hosting, maintenance, backup, storage, virtual infrastructure, payment processing, analysis, marketing, and other services for us, which may require them to access or use information about you.  If a service provider needs to access information about you to perform services on our behalf, they do so under close instruction from us, including appropriate security and confidentiality procedures designed to protect your information.
Atlassian Partners
: We work with third parties who provide consulting, sales, support, and technical services to deliver and implement customer solutions around the Services. We may disclose your information to these third parties in connection with their services, such as to assist with billing and collections, to provide localized support, and to provide customizations.  We may also disclose information to these third parties where you have agreed to that disclosure.
Third Party Apps
: You, your administrator or other Service users may choose to add new functionality or change the behavior of the Services by installing third party apps within the Services.  Doing so may give third-party apps access to your account and information about you like your name and email address, and any content you choose to use in connection with those apps.  If you are an administrator, or a technical or billing contact listed on an account, we disclose your details to the third-party app provider upon installation. Third-party app policies and procedures are not controlled by us, and this privacy policy does not cover how third-party apps use your information. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of third parties before connecting to or using their applications or services to learn more about their privacy and information handling practices. If you object to information about you being disclosed to these third parties, please uninstall the app.
Links to Third Party Sites
: The Services may include links that direct you to other websites or services whose privacy practices may differ from ours. If you submit information to any of those third party sites, your information is governed by their privacy policies, not this one. We encourage you to carefully read the privacy policy of any website you visit.
Third Party Services:
We may offer you the ability to interact with or disclose information to third parties through the Services. For example, we may offer users the ability to log in to the Services via a third-party service like Google, access embedded maps through Google Maps or interact with social media networks via links on the Services. When you intentionally interact with these third parties, we may disclose certain information to those third parties or receive information with those third parties, consistent with your privacy settings on the third-party service. Such information may include contact information, identification, and demographic information, and device information and identifiers. You should always check the privacy settings and notices in these third-party services to understand how those third-parties may use your information.
Third Party Widgets
: Some of our services contain widgets and social media features, such as the Twitter "tweet" button or Facebook "like" button. These widgets and features may collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on the Services, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Widgets and social media features are either hosted by a third-party or hosted directly on our Services. You should always check the privacy settings and notices in these third-party services to understand how those third-parties may use your information.
With your consent
: We disclose information about you to third parties when you give us consent to do so.  For example, we often display personal testimonials of satisfied customers on our public websites. With your consent, we may post your name alongside the testimonial.
Compliance with Enforcement Requests and Applicable Laws; Enforcement of Our Rights
: In exceptional circumstances, we may disclose information about you to a third party if we believe that sharing is reasonably necessary to (a) comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, including to meet national security requirements, (b) enforce our agreements, policies and terms of service, (c) protect the security or integrity of our products and services, (d) protect Atlassian, our customers or the public from harm or illegal activities, or (e) respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose information to assist in preventing the death or serious bodily injury of any person. For more information on how we respond to government requests, see our
Guidelines for Law Enforcement
and our
Transparency Report
.
Disclosing to affiliated companies
We disclose information we collect to affiliated companies and, in some cases, to prospective affiliates.  Affiliated companies are companies owned or operated by us.  The protections of this privacy policy apply to the information we disclose in these circumstances.
Atlassian companies
: We disclose information we have about you to other Atlassian corporate affiliates in order to operate and improve products and services and to offer other Atlassian affiliated services to you. This includes companies that own or operate the Services.
Business Transfers
: We may disclose or transfer information we collect under this privacy policy in connection with any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company. You will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on the Services if a transaction takes place, as well as any choices you may have regarding your information.
How we store and secure information we collect
Information storage and security
We use industry standard technical and organizational measures to secure the information we store. For more information on where and how we store your information, please see the
Atlassian Trust
,
Trello Trust
, and
Jira Align Trust
pages.
While we implement safeguards designed to protect your information, no security system is impenetrable and due to the inherent nature of the Internet, we cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, is absolutely safe from intrusion by others.
If you use our server or data center Services, responsibility for securing storage and access to the information you put into the Services rests with you and not Atlassian. We strongly recommend that server or data center users configure SSL to prevent interception of information transmitted over networks and to restrict access to the databases and other storage points used.
How long we keep information
How long we keep information we collect about you depends on the type of information, as described in further detail below.  After such time, we will either delete or de-identify your information or, if this is not possible (for example, because the information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your information and isolate it from any further use until deletion is possible.
Account information
: We retain your account information for as long as your account is active and a reasonable period thereafter in case you decide to re-activate the Services.  We also retain some of your information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, to resolve disputes, to enforce our agreements, to support business operations, and to continue to develop and improve our Services. Where we retain information for Service improvement and development, we take steps to eliminate information that directly identifies you, and we only use the information to uncover collective insights about the use of our Services, not to specifically analyze personal characteristics about you.
Information you share on the Services
: If your account is deactivated or disabled, some of your information and the content you have provided will remain in order to allow your team members or other users to make full use of the Services.  For example, we continue to display messages you sent to the users that received them and continue to display content you provided, but when requested details that can identify you will be removed.
Managed accounts
: If the Services are made available to you through an organization (e.g., your employer), we retain your information as long as required by the administrator of your account.  For more information, see "Managed accounts and administrators" above.
Marketing information
: If you have elected to receive marketing emails from us, we retain information about your marketing preferences for a reasonable period of time from the date you last expressed interest in our Services, such as when you last opened an email from us or ceased using your Atlassian account.  We retain information derived from cookies and other tracking technologies for a reasonable period of time from the date such information was created.
How to access and control your information
You have certain choices available to you when it comes to your information. Below is a summary of those choices, how to exercise them and any limitations.
Your Choices
:
Where applicable under local law, you may have certain rights with respect to your personal information.
Depending on which jurisdiction you live in, you may have the right to request information about our processing of your information, to request a copy of your information, to object to our use of your information (including for marketing purposes), to request the deletion or restriction of your information, to request your information in a structured, electronic format, to request to correct or update your information, to request to opt out of “sales” or “sharing” of personal information and targeted advertising (as these terms are defined under applicable law), and to request to opt out of certain profiling activities.  Below, we describe the tools and processes for making these requests.  You can exercise some of the choices by logging into the Services and using settings available within the Services or your account. Where the Services are administered for you by an administrator (see "Notice to End Users" below), you may need to contact your administrator to assist with your requests first.  For all other requests, you may contact us as provided in the Contact Us section below to request assistance.
Your request and choices may be limited in certain cases: for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal information about another person, or if you ask to delete information which we or your administrator are permitted by law or have compelling legitimate interests to keep.  Where you have asked us to disclose data to third parties, for example, by installing third-party apps, you will need to contact those third-party service providers directly to have your information deleted or otherwise restricted.  If you have unresolved concerns, you may have the right to complain to a data protection authority in the country where you live, where you work or where you feel your rights were infringed. Where applicable under local law, you may also contact us as provided in the “Contact Us” section below to appeal any decision we make relating to your request to exercise your rights.
Access and update your information
: Our Services and related documentation (see
Atlassian Documentation
,
Trello Help
, and
Loom Documentation
) give you the ability to access and update certain information about you from within the Service. For example, you can access your profile information from your account and search for content containing information about you using key word searches in the Service.  You can update your profile information within your profile settings and modify content that contains information about you using the editing tools associated with that content.
Deactivate your account
:   If you no longer wish to use our Services, you or your administrator may be able to deactivate your Services account. If you can deactivate your own account, that setting is available to you in your account settings. Otherwise, please contact your administrator. If you are an administrator and are unable to deactivate an account through your administrator settings, please contact the appropriate support team through
Atlassian
’s support pages.  Please be aware that deactivating your account does not delete your information; your information remains visible to other Service users based on your past participation within the Services.  For more information on how to delete your information, see below.
Delete your information
: Our Services and related documentation (see
Atlassian Documentation
, and
Loom Documentation
) give you the ability to delete certain information about you from within the Service. For example, you can remove content that contains information about you using the key word search and editing tools associated with that content, and you can remove certain profile information within your profile settings. Please note, however, that we may need to retain certain information for record keeping purposes, to complete transactions or to comply with our legal obligations.
Request that we stop using your information
:  In some cases, you may ask us to stop accessing, storing, using and otherwise processing your information where you believe we don't have the appropriate rights to do so.  For example, if you believe a Services account was created for you without your permission or you are no longer an active user, you can request that we delete your account as provided in this policy.  Where you gave us consent to use your information for a limited purpose, you can contact us to withdraw that consent, but this will not affect any processing that has already taken place at the time. You can also opt-out of our use of your information for certain marketing purposes by contacting us, as provided below.  When you make such requests, we may need time to investigate and facilitate your request.  If there is delay or dispute as to whether we have the right to continue using your information, we will restrict any further use of your information until the request is honored or the dispute is resolved, provided your administrator does not object (where applicable).  If you object to information about you being disclosed to a third-party app, please disable the app or contact your administrator to do so.
Opt out of communications
: You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from us by using the unsubscribe link within each email, updating your email preferences within your Service account settings menu, or by contacting us as provided below to have your contact information removed from our promotional email list or registration database.  Even after you opt out from receiving promotional messages from us, you will continue to receive transactional messages from us regarding our Services. You can opt out of some notification messages in your account settings. Please note, you will continue to receive generic ads.
Opt out of targeted advertising
: Where applicable under local law, you may have the right to opt out of targeted advertising by
clicking here
and following the instructions.
You may also be able to opt out of receiving personalized advertisements from other companies who are members of the Network Advertising Initiative or who subscribe to the Digital Advertising Alliance's Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. For more information about this practice and to understand your options, please visit:
http://www.aboutads.info
,
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/
and
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
Turn off Cookie Controls
: Relevant browser-based cookie controls are described in our
Cookies & Tracking Notice
. Please refer to
Loom’s Cookie Policy
for details on cookies and tracking technologies used within Loom products and websites.
Send "Do Not Track" Signals
: Some browsers have incorporated "Do Not Track" (DNT) features that can send a signal to the websites you visit indicating you do not wish to be tracked. Our websites may not respond to all browser-based DNT signals; however, our websites do respond to the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) to opt-out of “sales” of personal information and targeted advertising in certain locales. For more information on the GPC and how to use a browser or browser extension incorporating the GPC signal, see
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
. You can also use the range of other tools we provide to control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of receiving marketing from us as described above.
Data portability
: Data portability is the ability to obtain some of your information in a format you can move from one service provider to another (for instance, when you transfer your mobile phone number to another carrier).  Depending on the context, this applies to some of your information, but not to all of your information.  Should you request it, we will provide you with an electronic file of your basic account information and the information you create on the spaces under your sole control, like your personal Bitbucket repository.
How we transfer information we collect internationally
International transfers of information we collect
We collect information globally and may transfer, process, and store your information outside of your country of residence, to wherever we or our third-party service providers operate for the purpose of providing you the Services.  Whenever we transfer your information, we take steps to protect it.
International transfers within the Atlassian Companies
: To facilitate our global operations, we transfer information globally and allow access to that information from countries in which the Atlassian owned or operated companies have operations for the purposes described in this policy. These countries may not have equivalent privacy and data protection laws to the laws of many of the countries where our customers and users are based. When we disclose information about you within and among Atlassian corporate affiliates, we make use of the Data Privacy Framework to receive personal data transfers from the European Union/European Economic Area to the U.S. (see “Data Privacy Framework Notice” section below), and the standard contractual data protection clauses, which have been approved by the European Commission, to safeguard the transfer of information we collect from the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom (the "UK"), and Switzerland. Refer to
this page
for a list of countries to which we regularly transfer personal data.
International transfers to third parties
: Some of the third parties described in this privacy policy, which provide services to us under contract, are based in other countries that may not have equivalent privacy and data protection laws to the country in which you reside. When we disclose information of customers in the European Economic Area, the UK, or Switzerland, we make use of the European Commission-approved standard contractual data protection clauses, binding corporate rules for transfers to data processors, or other appropriate legal mechanisms to safeguard the transfer.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
On July 10, 2023, the European Commission’s adequacy decision for the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) entered into force.
Atlassian, Inc. and its U.S. subsidiaries (Atlassian Network Service, Inc., Dogwood Labs, Inc., AgileCraft LLC, Halp, Inc., Loom, Inc., Opsgenie, Inc., and Trello, Inc.) adhere to the Data Privacy Framework Principles regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal data that is transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the U.S.
Atlassian complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Atlassian has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Atlassian has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, please visit the Data Privacy Framework Program website
here
. To view Atlassian’s certifications, search for “Atlassian” in the Data Privacy Framework List.
As required under the principles, when we receive information under the Data Privacy Framework and then transfer it to a third-party service provider acting as an agent on our behalf, we have certain liability under the Data Privacy Framework if the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework and we are responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
We encourage you to contact us as provided below should you have a Data Privacy Framework related (or general privacy-related) complaint.  If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our
U.S.-based third-party dispute resolution provider
(free of charge).  Through this third-party dispute resolution provider, we have also committed to cooperating and complying with the information and advice provided by an informal panel of data protection authorities in the European Economic Area, and/or the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (as applicable) in relation to unresolved complaints (as further described in the Data Privacy Framework Principles). You may also contact your local data protection authority within the European Economic Area or Switzerland (as applicable) for unresolved complaints.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the
Data Privacy Framework website
, including when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted, you may invoke binding arbitration.
Atlassian, Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Other important privacy information
Notice to End Users
Many of our products are intended for use by organizations. Where the Services are made available to you through an organization (e.g. your employer), that organization is the administrator of the Services and is responsible for the accounts and/or Service sites over which it has control. If this is the case, please direct your data privacy questions to your administrator, as your use of the Services is subject to that organization's policies. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of an administrator's organization, which may be different than this policy.
Administrators are able to:
require you to reset your account password;
restrict, suspend or terminate your access to the Services;
access information in and about your account;
access or retain information stored as part of your account;
install or uninstall third-party apps or other integrations
In some cases, administrators can also:
restrict, suspend or terminate your account access;
change the email address associated with your account;
change your information, including profile information;
restrict your ability to edit, restrict, modify or delete information
Even if the Services are not currently administered to you by an organization, if you are a member of a Trello team administered by an organization, or if you use an email address provided by an organization (such as your work email address) to access the Services, then the owner of the domain associated with your email address (e.g. your employer) may assert administrative control over your account and use of the Services at a later date.  You will be notified if this happens.
If you do not want an administrator to be able to assert control over your account or use of the Services, you should deactivate your membership with the relevant Trello board, team or enterprise, or use your personal email address to register for or access the Services.  If an administrator has not already asserted control over your account or access to the Services, you can update the email address associated with your account through your account settings in your profile.  Once an administrator asserts control over your account or use of the Services, you will no longer be able to change the email address associated with your account without administrator approval.
Please contact your organization or refer to your administrator’s organizational policies for more information.
Additional disclosures for California residents
The disclosures in this section apply only to California residents and are intended to supplement the Atlassian Privacy Policy with information required by California law.
The table below describes the categories of personal information we collected in the past 12 months, the purposes for which we may collect and disclose this information, the categories of recipients of disclosures made for business purposes in the past 12 months, and the categories of recipients of disclosures made in the past 12 months that may be considered “sales” of personal information or “sharing” of personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising under California law.
Identifiers
, such as name, email address, unique identifiers associated with user or user account, IP Address
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
User authentication
Service access controls
Billing
Analytics and research
Marketing
Detecting security incidents
Debugging
Internal research
Service enhancements
Customer support
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Service Providers
Third Party Apps
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
Third Party Advertising Providers
Commercial information
, such as purchase details, transaction records, billing information, billing address, payment card details
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Billing
Analytics and research
Marketing
Detecting security incidents
Debugging
Internal research
Service enhancements
Customer support
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
-NA-
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, such as information about your usage of the Services, pseudonymous IDs, clickstream data, device and connection information, browser information, crash data, referring/exit URLs, IP Address
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Internal research
Service enhancements
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Event Sponsors
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
-NA-
Visual information
, such as photos or avatars, with your consent, recordings of your attendance at our events
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Internal research
Service enhancements
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Event Sponsors
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
-NA-
Professional or employment information
, such as job title, company name, company domain
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Analytics and research
Marketing
Detecting security incidents
Debugging
Internal research
Service enhancements
Customer support
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
-NA-
Geolocation data
, such as your approximate location, IP address, time zone
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Internal research
Service enhancements
Marketing-Customer support
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Atlassian Partners
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
Third Party Advertising Providers
Inferences
(drawn about you based on other personal information we collect), such as preferences, interests, user behavior data
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
Providing the Services
Internal research
Marketing
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
Third Party Advertising Providers
Sensitive personal information
, such as login credentials and passwords
Purpose(s) for Collecting & Disclosing
User authentication
Service access controls
Recipients of Disclosures for Business Purposes
Atlassian Companies
Service Providers
Recipients of “Sales” or “Sharing”
-NA-
If you have questions about the categories of information we may collect about you or the sources of such information, please be sure to visit the section of this policy called, “
What information we collect about you.
” For more details about our processing activities, please be sure to visit the section called, “
How we use information we collect.
” And for more information about how we may disclose information to third parties, please visit the section called, “
How we disclose information we collect.
”
Sensitive personal information:
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than permitted under applicable law.
Retention
: We retain your personal information for as long as necessary to carry out the business purposes described in this policy, or as otherwise required under law. The length of retention may vary depending upon factors such as recordkeeping or legal compliance requirements, the need to resolve inquiries or complaints, and the existence of an ongoing relationship with you. Please visit the “
How long we keep information
” section of this privacy policy for more information about specific retention criteria for different categories of personal information.
Exercising your rights
: If you are a California resident, there are some additional rights that may be available to you under the California Consumer Protection Act (“CCPA”). This policy explains the tools that we have made available to you to exercise your data rights under the CCPA, including such as the rights to request information about how we process your personal information, request deletion and the right to request access to the specific pieces of categories of personal information we have collected about you.
For more information on how to exercise these your rights, please visit the “
How to access and control your information
” section of this policy. We encourage you to manage your information, and to make use of the privacy controls we have included in our Services. You will not be discriminated against for exercising any of your privacy rights under the CCPA. In order to protect your information from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to provide additional information to for verification your identity. If we cannot verify your identity, we will not be able to fulfill your requests to know, access provide, correct, or delete your information.
Opt out of certain disclosures to third parties
: You may also opt out of “sales” of personal information and “sharing” of personal information for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising by clicking
here
and following the instructions. Where required, we also honor requests to opt out submitted via privacy preference signals recognized under applicable law, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”). For more information on the GPC and how to use a browser or browser extension incorporating the GPC signal, see
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
. We do not knowingly sell or share the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Authorized agent
: You may also authorize an agent to exercise your rights on your behalf. To do this, you must provide the authorized agent with written permission to exercise your rights on your behalf, and we may request a copy of this written permission from the agent when they make a request on your behalf. We may also ask you to verify your own identity and directly confirm with you that you have granted permission to the authorized agent.
Our policy towards children
The Services are not directed to individuals under 18. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 18. If we become aware that a child under 18 has provided us with personal information, we will take steps to delete such information. If you become aware that a child has provided us with personal information, please contact the appropriate support team (see
Atlassian
,
Jira Align
, or
Trello
support pages).
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We may change this privacy policy from time to time. We will post any privacy policy changes on this page and, if the changes are significant, we will provide a more prominent notice by adding a notice on the Services homepages, login screens, or by sending you an email notification. We will also keep prior versions of this Privacy Policy in an archive for your review.  We encourage you to review our privacy policy whenever you use the Services to stay informed about our information practices and the ways you can help protect your privacy.
If you disagree with any changes to this privacy policy, you will need to stop using the Services and deactivate your account(s), as outlined above.
Contact Us
Your information is controlled by Atlassian Pty Ltd and Atlassian, Inc.  If you have questions or concerns about how your information is handled, please direct your inquiry to Atlassian Pty Ltd, which we have appointed to be responsible for facilitating such inquiries or, if you are a resident of the European Economic Area, please contact our EU Representative.
Atlassian Pty Ltd
c/o Atlassian, Inc.
350 Bush Street, Floor 13
San Francisco, CA 94104
E-Mail:
privacy@atlassian.com
EU Representative:
Atlassian B.V.
c/o Atlassian, Inc.
350 Bush Street, Floor 13
San Francisco, CA 94104
E-Mail:
eudatarep@atlassian.com
UK Representative:
Atlassian (UK) Operations Limited
c/o Herbert Smith Freehills LLP
Exchange House
Primrose Street
London EC2A 2EG
United Kingdom
E-Mail:
ukrepresentative@atlassian.com
Key Changes
Effective May 17, 2024
We have updated the section Data Privacy Framework Notice as part of our Data Privacy Framework certification.
Effective April 1, 2024
We have incorporated Loom into the Privacy Policy.
Effective July 17, 2023
We have replaced the section
Privacy Shield Notice
with
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Notice
to reflect the European Commission’s adequacy decision for the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF) on July 10, 2023.
Effective January 1, 2020
We have updated the
Other important privacy information
section by adding a section on the California Consumer Privacy Act.
November 1, 2019
We are updating our Privacy Policy to reflect Jira Align and Trello specific examples as we fully integrate them into the Atlassian family.
We added details on data we may collect from third parties and public databases.
We provided information about how we create user profiles and how you can opt out of this.
November 1, 2018
We are updating our Privacy Policy to reflect the expansion of our cloud data storage infrastructure
May 25, 2018
Better navigation and user-friendly language. To make the policy easier to understand, we use clear, plain language and examples that illustrate our activities. We reformatted our privacy policy page with active links, so you can quickly find the information that matters most to you.
How we integrate our products. We're always improving our products to give you a frictionless and customized experience. The updates to our policy describe the tools we’ve built to make our products smarter and allow you to move seamlessly from one Atlassian product to another.
More control over your information. We make it easy for you to control the information you provide to us. Our policy explains how you can make choices about your information, and the measures we’ve put in place to keep your information secure.
Using our products for work. Many users have access to our services through their organizations (e.g., their employers), who control their accounts or use of our services. The updated policy clarifies our relationship to these users and explains the tools available to administrators of these users.
Related content
Former Workplace Privacy Notice
Learn more
Careers Privacy Notice
Learn more
Diversity Survey Privacy Notice
Learn more
Cookies & Tracking Notice
Learn more
Stay informed
Subscribe to receive notifications from us about updates to our legal terms (including our legal policies) and our list of sub-processors.
Sign up for updates
Sub-policy 3
https://miro.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Product
Solutions
Resources
Pricing
Contact Sales
Login
Sign up free
Miro legal information
Table of contents
Table of contents
AI Features Addendum
Code of Conduct
Cookies Policy
Customer Data Processing Addendum
Current Subprocessors List
Developer Terms of Use
Master Cloud Agreement
Miro Imprint
Miro Marketplace Terms of Use
Miro Master Cloud Agreement Guide
Online Community Terms of Use
Open Source Software - Client
Open Source Software - Site
Prior Master Cloud Agreement "MCA" Versions
Privacy Policy
Recruitment Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Vendor Data Processing Addendum
Vendor Information Security Schedule
Solutions Partner Program Agreement
DMCA Policy
Miro Supplier Code of Conduct
Cookie List
Miro Modern Slavery Statement
Privacy Policy
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
Effective Date:  August 23, 2024
This Privacy Policy describes how RealtimeBoard, Inc. dba Miro, including its affiliates and subsidiaries (collectively,
Miro
and also referred to as
our
,
us
and
we
) collects, uses and discloses information from or about an identified or identifiable person, including information that we can associate with an individual person (“
Personal Data
”), as well as any choices you have with respect to your Personal Data.
1. Applicability of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy applies to Miro’s online collaboration tools and platform, including the associated Miro mobile and desktop applications (collectively, the “
Services
”), miro.com and other Miro websites (collectively, the “
Websites
”) and other interactions (e.g. customer support, the Miro Community, etc.) you may have with Miro, including the processing of any messages, text, files, images, video or audio recordings, or other content submitted through our Services (collectively, “
Customer Content
”). This Privacy Policy does not apply to any third-party applications or software that integrate with our Services (“
Third-Party Services
”), or any other third-party products, services or businesses.
You, the organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) controlling the use of the Services (“
Organization
”) and any associated Customer Content, and any individuals who are granted access to the Services by an Organization (“
Users
” and, collectively with you and an Organization, “
Customer
”) are also bound by the the
Terms of Service
or the
Master Cloud Agreement
, as applicable, and any product-specific Terms (together, the “
Customer Agreement”
).
If you have any questions about specific Organization settings and privacy practices, please contact the Customer whose Organization you use. If you have received an invitation to join an Organization but have not yet created an account, you should request assistance from the Customer that sent the invitation.
2. Identifying the Data Controller and Processor
Data protection law in certain jurisdictions differentiates between the “controller” and “processor” of Personal Data. Whether Miro or Customer is the controller or processor of Personal Data depends on the type of data used and the purposes for such use.
Customer is the controller for all Customer Content that is also Personal Data. As the controller, Customer may, for example, use the Services to grant and remove access to an Organization, assign roles and configure settings, access, modify, export, share and remove information and otherwise apply its policies to the Services. As the processor for Customer Content, Miro processes Customer Content that is Personal Data only on Customer’s request and in accordance with Customer’s written instructions, including the applicable terms in the Customer Agreement, Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law. For more information about how Customer Content is processed (such as how your Personal Data is processed, the purpose and legal basis for processing, and your data subject rights), we refer you to the relevant Customer’s privacy notice.
Miro is the controller for Services Data as defined in Section 3.
3. The types of Personal Data we collect
Your Personal Data is provided by you, obtained from third parties, and/or created by us when you use the Services.
Customer Content.
Customers routinely submit Customer Content to Miro when using the Services.
Services Data.
Miro also collects, generates and/or receives the following types of Personal Data, other than Customer Content, through and in connection with Miro’s provision of the Services (the “Services Data”):
Organization and account information.
To create or update an Organization account, you or the relevant Customer (e.g. you or your employer) will supply Miro with an email address, phone number, password, domain and/or similar account details. We may also receive your email address and name from Slack or other organizations with whom our platform has integrations through which you may sign up to use our Services.
Billing information.
Customers that purchase a paid version of the Services may provide Miro (or its payment processors) with billing details such as credit card information, banking information and/or a billing address.
Service metadata.
When a User interacts with the Services, metadata is generated to provide additional context about their use of the Services. For example, Miro logs the Organizations, boards, people, features, content and links that you view or interact with, as well the types of files shared and any Third-Party Services that you use.
Log data.
Like most websites and services delivered over the Internet, our servers automatically collect information when you access or use our Websites or Services, recording this information in log files. This log data may include the Internet Protocol (IP) address, the address of the web page visited before using the Website or Services, your browser type and settings, the date and time the Services were used, information about browser configuration and plugins, and language preferences.
Device data.
Miro collects information about devices accessing the Services, including the type of device, operating system used, device settings, application IDs, unique device identifiers and crash data. Whether we collect some or all of this Services Data often depends on the type of device used and its settings.
Location data.
We receive information from you, the relevant Customer and other third-parties that helps us approximate your location. We may, for example, use a business address submitted by your employer or an IP address received from your browser or device to determine approximate location. Miro may also collect location information from devices in accordance with the consent provided by your device.
Third-party data.
Miro may receive data about organizations, industries, lists of companies that are customers, Website visitors, marketing campaigns and other matters relevant to our business from parent corporations, affiliates and subsidiaries, our partners, or other third parties that we use to make our own information more useful. This data may be combined and may include aggregate-level data. For example, information about how well an online marketing or email campaign performed, or to create a business contacts directory.
Marketing and communications Data.
Miro may obtain marketing information, including your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties and your communication preferences.
Cookie data.
Miro uses a variety of cookies and similar technologies in our Websites and Services to help us collect Services Data. For more details about how we use these technologies, as well as your opt-out opportunities and other options, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Email performance data.
Miro uses a ‘clear image’ (gif) in email communications in order to track engagement and performance metrics. Much of this data is aggregated and does not contain Personal Data. If you wish to turn off this tracking, you can do so by turning off images in the email itself.
Third-Party Services data.
A Customer may choose to use Third-Party Services. If Customer enables Third-Party Services, Miro may access and exchange Customer Content and Services Data with the Third-Party on Customer’s behalf, in accordance with our agreement with the Third-Party Services and any permissions granted by the Customer (including its User(s)).
Contact
data.
In accordance with the consent provided by your device or other third-party API, we process any contact information that a User chooses to import when using the Services.
Community data
. We also receive Services Data when submitted to our Websites or in other ways, such as if you participate in the Miro Community, Miro Academy, or Miroverse. This data is either submitted directly to the Services, or collected during Forums, Programs, contests, activities, events, or educational programs hosted by Miro (or a vendor).
Call data.
Our Customer Success team may record video or telephone calls with Customers for the purposes of training and quality assurance. You will be notified of this when a recording is made, and can request that Miro does not record these calls.
Additional data provided to Miro.
If you use Miro’s AI features pursuant to our Terms of Service, Services Data also includes data associated with your interaction with these technologies.  We also receive Services Data when submitted to our Websites or in other ways, such as when you request support, interact with our social media accounts or otherwise communicate with Miro.
Business data
. Miro may receive information about individuals from organizations, industries, Customers, (potential) partners, parent corporations, affiliates and subsidiaries, and our partners for cooperation and communication purposes.
Generally, no one is under a statutory or contractual obligation to provide any Personal Data. However, certain Personal Data is collected automatically and, if some Personal Data, such as Organization setup details, is not provided, we may be unable to provide the Services.
4. How we use Personal Data
Customer Content.
Customer Content that is Personal Data will be used by Miro in accordance with Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law.
Services Data.
Miro uses Services Data for the purposes of our legitimate interests in operating our Services, Websites and business. More specifically, Miro uses Services Data:
To provide, update, maintain and protect our Services, Websites and business.
This includes the use of Services Data to support delivery of the Services under a Customer Agreement, including to create or update an Organization, to prevent or address service errors, security or technical issues, and to analyze and monitor usage of the product and its features, trends and other activities.
To provide, update, maintain and otherwise operate the Miro Community, Miro Academy and Miroverse.
This includes facilitating collaboration and interaction between Users when engaging with the Miro Community or Miroverse, and/or recording learners’ progress and certifications in Miro Academy.
To develop and improve products and Services
, including AI features, provided you have not opted out.
To comply with applicable law, legal process or regulation.
To support and communicate with you by responding to your requests, comments and questions.
If you contact us, we may use your Services Data to respond.
To develop, test and provide search, learning and productivity tools and additional features.
Miro tries to make the Services as useful as possible. For example, we make Services suggestions based on historical use and predictive models, identify organizational trends and insights, customize your experience of the Services, or to create and develop new features and products.
To conduct market and user research.
To improve our Services and troubleshoot new products and features, we may carry out research. For example we may survey Customers (including Admins, Users and other contacts) or third parties about customer satisfaction, user experience, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and their broader interests.
To send emails and other communications.
Transactional
: As part of our services, we provide users with certain communications and updates, We may send you service, transactional, technical and other administrative communications, such as communications about your account, our Service offerings, changes to the Services, and important Services-related notices, such as security and fraud notices. We consider these communications as part of our Services to you.
Soft opt-in / Legitimate Interests
: In addition, where you are a non-enterprise user or you if you have opted-in as an enterprise user, we sometimes send emails about new product features, recommendations and promotional communications, or other news about Miro. You can opt-out of these messages at any time by using the unsubscribe link included in all of these communications.
For billing, account management and other administrative matters.
Miro may need to contact you for invoicing, account management, and similar reasons and we use account data to administer accounts and keep track of billing and payments.
To investigate and help prevent security issues and abuse.
To manage and to contact you with regard to involvement.
We may need to manage and contact you with regard to your involvement and participation in the Miro Community (such as the Forums, Programs, Miroverse, contests, activities, events or educational programs hosted by Miro or a vendor).
If information is aggregated or pseudonymized so that it can no longer reasonably be associated with an identified or identifiable natural person, Miro may use it for any business purpose.
5. Data Retention
Miro will retain Customer Content and Personal Data in accordance with a Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law. The deletion of Customer’s Personal Data may result in the deletion and/or pseudonymization of an account and certain associated Services Data. Miro may retain Services Data for as long as necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Further, note that we may keep certain types of Services Data after the deactivation of an account for the period needed for Miro to pursue legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with (and demonstrate compliance with) legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
6. How we share and disclose Personal Data
This section describes how Miro may share and disclose Personal Data. Customers determine their own policies and practices for the sharing and disclosure of Personal Data. Miro does not control how they or any other third party chooses to share or disclose Personal Data.
Miro may share and disclose Personal Data in accordance with a Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and the Customer’s use of the Services and in compliance with applicable law. Where necessary, may only share Personal Data with third parties where we have obtained consent to do so.
We may share Personal Data as follows:
Displaying the Services
. When a User submits Customer Content (including Personal Data), it may be displayed to other Users that have access to the same Miro Board. For example, an User’s name and Miro profile may be displayed. Please consult the Help Center for more information on this functionality.
Customer access
. Owners, administrators, Users, and other Customer representatives and personnel may be able to access, modify, or restrict access to Personal Data. This may include, for example, your employer using Service features to export logs of your activity or accessing or modifying your profile details..
Subprocessors.
We may engage third-parties as sub-processors to process Personal Data. These third parties may, for example, provide virtual computing and storage services, or we may share business information to develop strategic partnerships to support our Customers. Please see more information on our subprocessors
here
.
Third-Party Services
. Customers may enable Third-Party Services. When enabled, Miro may access and exchange Customer Content with the provider of a Third-Party Service on Customer’s behalf. For example, the AI features may share limited data with Microsoft in connection with the use of the AI features and to monitor compliance with codes of conduct. Third-Party Services are not owned or controlled by Miro and third parties that have been granted access to Personal Data may have their own policies and practices for its collection, use, and sharing. Please check the permissions, privacy settings, and notices for these Third-Party Services or contact the relevant provider with any questions.
Partners.
We may share Personal Data with developers, partners and others we engage to create Miro applications and/or integrating Miro features.
Forums
. The information you choose to provide in a community forum, including Personal Data, will be publicly available.
Corporate Affiliates
. Miro may share Personal Data with its corporate affiliates, parents and/or subsidiaries for business continuity purposes.
During a change to Miro’s business
. If Miro engages in a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, sale of some or all of Miro’s assets or stock, financing, public offering of securities, acquisition of all or a portion of our business, a similar transaction or proceeding, or steps in contemplation of such activities, some or all Personal Data may be shared or transferred, subject to standard confidentiality arrangements.
To comply with laws.
If we receive a request for Personal Data, we may disclose Personal Data if we reasonably believe disclosure is in accordance with or required by any applicable law, regulation, or legal process.
To enforce our rights, prevent fraud, and for safety.
To protect and defend the rights, property or safety of Miro, its users, or third parties, including enforcing its contracts or policies, or in connection with investigating and preventing illegal activity, fraud, or security issues, including to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
7. Security
Miro takes the security of Personal Data seriously. Miro strives to protect Personal Data from unauthorized access or disclosure. Miro cannot guarantee that Personal Data stored or sent to Miro will be completely safe and encourages you to use caution. To the maximum extent allowed by applicable law, you agree and acknowledge that Miro will not be liable or responsible if any information about you is intercepted, accessed, and/or used by an unintended recipient.
8. Our responsibility for third party links
Our Services may contain links to websites and services operated by third parties, which we do not own or control. This Privacy Statement does not apply to your use of such third party websites, and you should read the relevant privacy notices and terms and conditions before using such websites or services.
9. Age Restriction
Miro does not allow use of our Services and Websites by anyone younger than 16 years old (“
Minor
”). If you learn that a Minor has unlawfully provided us with Personal Data, please contact us and we will take steps to delete this information.
By using our Services and Websites, you represent and warrant that you are not a Minor as of the date of first access to our Services and Websites.
10. International Transfers
RealtimeBoard Inc. has an international corporate presence, as such our collection of Personal Data necessarily involves the transmission of data on an international basis. If you are an individual located outside of the United States, please be aware that information we collect may be transferred to and processed in the United States and elsewhere outside the United States. As more fully described in the Customer Agreement terms between you and RealtimeBoard Inc., Personal Data may be transferred across international borders, including without limitation from the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK to the United States. Any cross-border transfers of Personal Data are supported by an approved adequacy mechanism where required by applicable law, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses.
RealtimeBoard Inc. complies with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-US DPF
”), the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-US DPF
”) as set forth by the US Department of Commerce. RealtimeBoard Inc. has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
EU-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-US DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. RealtimeBoard Inc. has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
Swiss-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-US DPF. With respect to onward transfers of Personal Data to the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US DPF, we remain liable for processing such transfers in accordance with the Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-US DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-US DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please
visit the US Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website by clicking here or visiting
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
RealtimeBoard Inc. may disclose your Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. If you have a question or complaint related to participation by RealtimeBoard Inc. in the DPF program, we encourage you to contact us
online
. For any complaints related to the DPF that RealtimeBoard Inc. cannot resolve directly, we have chosen to cooperate with the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, or a panel established by the European data protection authorities, for resolving disputes with EU individuals, the UK Information Commissioner (ICO) for resolving disputes with UK individuals, and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals. Please contact us if you’d like us to direct you to your data protection authority contacts. As further explained in the Principles, binding arbitration is available to address residual complaints not resolved by other means. RealtimeBoard Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
If we share your Personal Data with any RealtimeBoard Inc. affiliates or third parties located in countries outside the European Economic Area, Switzerland, the UK, or the United States we take steps to ensure that appropriate safeguards are in place to guarantee the continued protection of your Personal Data, such as by entering into the EU Standard Contractual Clauses adopted by the European Commission (article 46(2)(c) GDPR), which are available
here
, and which were also adopted by the UK Government under section 119A of the UK Data Protection Act 2018.
11. Your Rights
Where we are the controller of your Personal Data, and subject to the privacy rights granted to you under the law in your country, you have the following rights:
Access.
You can request access to your Personal Data, subject to applicable law.
Portability.
You can request a copy of your Personal Data that we process on the basis of consent or in order to perform a contract with you.
Erasure.
You can request to erase your Personal Data that we are not required to process for compliance with law or in connection with legal claims. Where we rely on an exemption, we will inform you about this.
C
orrection.
You can request that we correct inaccurate information we maintain about you.
Objection and restriction of processing.
You can use the "unsubscribe" link in our marketing communications to stop us from using your information for that direct marketing.  You can object to our processing of your Personal Data where we rely on legitimate interests or perform a task in the public interest. We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including reasonable expectations of Miro customers, the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing, which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms, or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld and we will cease processing your Personal Data.
Withdrawal of consent
. Where you have provided your consent to our processing of your Personal Data, you can withdraw your consent at any time. If you do withdraw consent, it will not affect the lawfulness of what we have done with your Personal Data before you withdrew consent.
To exercise your rights or ask us any questions pertaining to your rights, please contact us using the details set out in Section 14 below. Please note that we may request you to provide us with additional information in order to confirm your identity and ensure that you are entitled to access the relevant personal information.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
12. Certain United States-specific Rights
Categories of Personal Data we receive
. We may collect, or process on behalf of our customers, the categories of Personal Data described in Section 3 above.
Sources
. For information regarding the categories of sources from which we collect your Personal Data, please see Sections 3 and 4 above.
Our business and commercial purposes for use
. For information regarding the specific purposes for which we collect and disclose your Personal Data, please see Sections 4 and 7 above.
Retention
. Information about our retention of Personal Data is described in Section 5 above. We only use and disclose sensitive personal information for the purposes specified in applicable law or otherwise with your consent.
Depending on where you live in the United States, you may have the following rights:
Access
.
You can request access to the Personal Data we hold about you, how we use it and who we share it with.
Deletion.
You can request that we delete any of your Personal Data that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions.
Correction
. You can request that we correct inaccurate information we maintain about you.
Opt out of “Sale” and “Sharing”
. While we do not sell your Personal Data in the conventional sense, we may use advertising and analytics services that are intended to analyze your use of our Services based on information obtained from cookies or other trackers, including for delivering advertising to you (such as interest-based, targeted, or cross-context behavioral advertising). You can opt out of the use of cookies and other trackers on our website by setting your preferences on our homepage. You will need to set your preferences from each device and each web browser from which you wish to opt out. This feature uses a cookie to remember your preference, so if you clear all cookies from your browser, you will need to re-select your preferred settings. We do not have actual knowledge that we “sell” or “share” the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Portability
. You can request that we transfer to you a copy of the Personal Data we hold about you.
Withdrawal of Consen
t. Where we rely on consent to process your Personal Data, you may have the right to withdraw this consent at any time. If you confirm that you wish to withdraw your consent, we will delete your information from our systems. However, you acknowledge this may limit our ability to provide you with the best possible products and services.
You can exercise your rights as described above by contacting us as set out in Section 14. Only you, or a person or business entity registered with the California Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf (an “authorized agent”), may make the requests set forth above. You may also make a request on behalf of your minor child. The request should include your contact information and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it. In addition, you should provide adequate information that we can reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected the personal information (including information that enables us to verify the identifying information we possibly maintain about you).
We will respond to consumer requests in a reasonably timely manner. If we require extra time to respond, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. In order to protect the security of your Personal Data, we will not honor a request if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Data relates to you. The method used to verify your identity will depend on the type, sensitivity and value of the information, including the risk of harm to you posed by any authorized access or deletion. Generally speaking, verification will be performed by matching the identifying information provided by you to the Personal Data that we already have.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding our receipt of your request (and will not be made more than twice in a 12-month period). If we cannot comply with a request, or cannot fully comply with a request, the response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights based on California data protection laws, including, but not limited to, by:
Denying you goods or services.
Charging you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Providing you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggesting that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
13. Changes to this Privacy Policy
Miro may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. Laws, regulations, and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our services or business. We will post the changes to this page and we encourage you to review our Privacy Policy to stay informed. If we make material changes to the Privacy Policy, Miro will take commercially reasonable efforts to notify you and take additional steps as required by law. If you disagree with the changes to this Privacy Policy, you should deactivate your account and discontinue your use of the Services. Contact the relevant Customer if you wish to request the removal of your Personal Data under their control.
14. How to contact Miro
If you have questions about this Privacy Policy, or regarding your Personal Data, you can contact us
online
, or by mail at:
RealtimeBoard, Inc. dba Miro
ATTN: Privacy Team
201 Spear St
Suite 1100
94105
San Francisco, USA
Our representative in the European Union:
RealtimeBoard BV
ATTN: Data Protection Team
Singel 542
1017 AZ
Amsterdam, NL
Product
Online whiteboard
Apps & Integrations
Templates
Miroverse
Miro Developer Platform
Miro for Devices
Enterprise Guard
Accessibility
Changelog
Product
Online whiteboard
Apps & Integrations
Templates
Miroverse
Miro Developer Platform
Miro for Devices
Enterprise Guard
Accessibility
Changelog
Solutions
Meetings and Workshops
Brainstorming & Ideation
Agile practices
Diagramming
Research & Design
Strategy & Planning
Mind Map
Concept Map
Online Sticky Notes
Flowchart Maker
Wireframe
Solutions
Meetings and Workshops
Brainstorming & Ideation
Agile practices
Diagramming
Research & Design
Strategy & Planning
Mind Map
Concept Map
Online Sticky Notes
Flowchart Maker
Wireframe
Resources
Miro Academy
Help Center
Blog
Status
Miro Community
Miro Events
Resources
Miro Academy
Help Center
Blog
Status
Miro Community
Miro Events
Company
About us
Careers 🚀
Miro in the News
Customer Stories
Company
About us
Careers 🚀
Miro in the News
Customer Stories
Plans and Pricing
Pricing
Business
Enterprise
Consultants
Education
Startups
NPOs
Contact sales
Plans and Pricing
Pricing
Business
Enterprise
Consultants
Education
Startups
NPOs
Contact sales
English
Miro ©
2025
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Manage Cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://whereby.com/user/privacy/consents:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
This website uses cookies
We use cookies 🍪 to improve your experience on our site. To find out more read our
Cookie Policy
. To customise your experience, go to
Cookie Settings
.
Cookie settings
Accept all cookies
Accept all cookies
Cookie settings
Not found
You just hit a route that doesn’t exist
Take me home
Sub-policy 5
https://whereby.helpscoutdocs.com/article/526-data-storage-and-security:
Data Storage and Security
Table of Contents
How is communication secured
GDPR
Data Processing Agreement (DPA)
Credit Card Details
Whereby is built in Norway by privacy-friendly Europeans. As an ethically-ambitious company, we take your security seriously. We don’t sell or mine your data, which is stored securely in the EU, we’re GDPR-compliant, and all content is encrypted.
Because we're GDPR compliant we have systems in place so you can see how your data is used,
delete your profile
with all data, or
export any data
Whereby is storing about you. Below we've laid out some common questions we get about data security with answers on the steps we've taken. If you don't see the question you're looking for, feel free to reach out to us at
legal@whereby.com
.
How is my communication in Whereby secured?
Locking rooms
The video and audio communication in a Whereby room is only visible to participants inside a room. It's not possible for another user to listen in on room data unless they are present in the room themselves (which means they would be visible to everyone in the room). Because the room URL is a public URL, it's possible for anyone who can guess a room name to enter an open room that has a host present in it. If you want to prevent others from coming into the conversation, we recommend locking the room by clicking the Lock button in the room menu. If you are the owner of a room you can keep the room locked at all times, so no one else can enter it. After doing this no new participants will be able to enter the room without the owner's permission. This is thanks to the Knock feature, where a user can ask to be let in, and the owner can the let them in or stop them from joining.
Chat
Chat messages are not stored permanently. They pass through our server that connects the users in the call temporarily in order to pass them on to each participant in the call, but are deleted from server as soon as it has been delivered to the participant's computer. Additionally, as each participant leaves the room the chat messages that were stored locally on their computer are deleted.
Encryption and security
All communication between your browser and Whereby is transmitted over an encrypted connection (HTTPS using TLS). Real time messaging is done using encrypted WebSockets or polling using HTTPS. By default, rooms are set to Group call mode, and will use a dedicated server infrastructure for calls. With this infrastructure, streams will always be encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) in transit, but will be decrypted and re-encrypted when passing through the video routers.
Users can also choose to use
Small meeting mode
if they wish to prioritize having end-to-end encryption over quality and stability. In “Small meeting” mode, communication between participants is primarily sent through peer-to-peer connections, where audio and video streams are sent directly between participants and do not pass through any of our servers. Video and audio transmitted in the Service is then sent directly between the participants in a room and is encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) with client-generated encryption keys. In cases where a user is behind a strict firewall or NAT, video and audio need to be relayed via a TURN server, but end-to-end encryption is still maintained.
We take pride in collecting and storing as little user data as possible in the service. No audio or video is ever stored on our servers.
How we process media (audio/video)
We will never store any media sent between participants in a room. The "Recording" feature which is available in the Pro and Business plans only allow client-side recording, so the recording is never uploaded to our servers. The user who starts the recording (the user must be a host in a room to do this) are then responsible for getting consents from all participants in the meeting prior to starting the recording. They are also responsible for storing and processing the recording in compliance with regulations after downloading it from Whereby.
By default rooms are set to our
Group mode
, which is available in all plans. Calls using the Group mode will use a dedicated server infrastructure to allow more people in conversation, and better stability. Your stream will be sent through video router servers which transmits it to the other participants in the call, and also transmits their streams to you. With this infrastructure, streams will always be encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) in transit, but will be decrypted and re-encrypted when passing through the video routers.
In
Small mode
, communication between participants are primarily sent through
peer-to-peer connections
, where audio and video streams are sent directly between participants and do not pass through any of our servers, in cases where this is allowed by the network the user is on. Video and audio transmitted in the Service is then sent directly between the participants in a room and is encrypted (DTLS-SRTP) with client-generated encryption keys. In cases where a user is behind a strict firewall or NAT (e.g. on a strict corporate network roughly),
video and audio need to be relayed via a TURN server, but end-to-end encryption is still maintained.
Where our servers are located
We operate a global infrastructure of video routers distributed across the world, and users will be automatically routed to the closest available one to them. This means that e.g.
users in a European country, will connect to a data center physically located within the EEC
. The video router servers and all of our infrastructure adhere to strict security measures, preventing any eavesdropping or interruption of the video/audio streams. Media sent between participants in a room will not be stored. Hosting providers used to route video calls do not have ability to access or control the data streams, nor is any transmission initiated by them, and data sent through Whereby is initiated by the customer, the customer select the receiver of the transmission and Whereby or its sub-contractors is not able to select or modify the information contained in the transmission, cf. GDPR Article 2 (4).
All user account data is stored in Ireland. You can see a full overview of the types of data that are being processed and stored, with the legal reasons for each category, in our
Privacy Policy
or
Data Processing Agreement (PDF)
.
Privacy
We in Whereby are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our users. Our business model is to provide a paid service to users who need additional features on top of the Free version, and does not rely on widespread collection of general user data. We will only collect and process information that we need to deliver the service to you, and to continue to maintain and develop the service.
Whereby may collect, store and process various kinds of data, with different legal grounds, as listed in our
Privacy Policy
. For the categories of data that require your consent, we will actively ask you for consent before collecting any data. You can give and revoke your consents at any time in your Profile page in your account. Here you can also download a JSON file with the information we have stored about you, and delete your user account with all data.
You can reference more of our security and privacy standards in our
Terms of Service
.
GDPR
Is Whereby a Data Processor?
For customers on our Free plan, we decide what data we collect from users and the purpose of processing. This, according to the definitions in GDPR, defines us as a Data Controller, and not a Data Processor with regards to our Free users. It is therefore not relevant for us to offer a Data Processing Agreement to individual customers.
This is clearly defined in GDPR Article 1 "Definitions"
Point 7:
‘controller’ means the natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data; where the purposes and means of such processing are determined by Union or Member State law, the controller or the specific criteria for its nomination may be provided for by Union or Member State law;
Point 8:
processor’ means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which processes personal data
on behalf of the controller
;
Since our Free plan is only offered to individuals and we do not enter into a corporate commercial agreement where your company instructs us to process personal information for you, every individual user of Whereby will be the data subject in the case where they sign up for an account with us, the Data Controller. A Data Processor is someone who only processes data on the Data Controller's requests and instructions, and within strictly defined purposes, e.g. a hosting provider.
Our
Privacy Policy
states the following:
"This policy applies where we are acting as a Data Controller with respect to the personal data of users of our Services; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data. For content and data that you upload to or make available through the Service (“User Content”), you are responsible for ensuring this content is in accordance with our Terms of Service, and that the content is not violating other users’ privacy."
Regarding information that you choose to upload or share through Whereby, our
Terms of Service
state:
"You are responsible for your use of the Whereby, including the lawfulness of any content displayed, shared, uploaded or otherwise made available by you in the Service (“the User Content”). User Content includes room names, and you are responsible for ensuring room names does not include Prohibited User Content (as listed below). Your room names are used to construct the URLs identifying your rooms, and guests you invite and other third parties can (request to) enter your rooms based on these URLs. As these guests do not need to authenticate to Whereby in order to do this, please be aware that room names must be considered public information. Do not include information that you do not want to make public in room names."
Data Processing Agreement (DPA)
For our paying customers, we offer a Data Processing Agreement. These plans allow companies and organizations to set up team accounts, and thus have the ability that an admin user can import emails of other employees when inviting them (which constitutes Personal Identifiable Information). We have a Data Processing Agreement (DPA) as part of our Terms of Service for all our paying customers.
From 15th February 2022, an
updated version of the DPA
applies to our Embedded customers. For transparency reasons, we have decided to keep the older versions available for our customers:
DPA Spring 2021
Old DPA
Who has my credit card details?
We use Stripe and Chargebee for our credit card processing and storage. Both are extremely reliable, global payment processors that manage transactions for thousands of customers every day. Both companies are  PCI Service Provider Level 1, which is the strictest level of certification possible for a payment processor and use high-level security to achieve this. They are also GDPR compliant. You can read more about both companies security measures here:
https://stripe.com/no/payments
https://www.chargebee.com/security/
Last updated on April 15, 2022
Toggle Search
Categories
Getting Started
Plans
FAQ
Troubleshooting
Meeting Controls
Room Management
Billing & Subscriptions
Whereby Embedded
No results found